Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.100

Receiver—Final account and discharge.

The receiver shall file a final account, pay remaining funds to the county treasurer, and be discharged, all as provided in RCW 35.07.220.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.100.]